Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,153
Workers' compensation insurance; association; powers.

Under insurance policies obtained pursuant to section 44-3,151, an association is entitled to negotiate with the insurer regarding policy terms, including premiums, discounts, dividends, commissions, fees, and costs. If any policy provides for any deductible for any benefits payable under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, it shall be in conformance with section 48-146.03. The insurer shall only enter into arrangements which allow it to report data compatible with the uniform classification system and with experience rating as required by subsections (1) and (2) of section 44-7524.

Laws 1996, LB 515, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 1119, § 36.

Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, see section 48-1,110.